Utah statutes.
13-26-10.   Provisions of chapter not exclusive.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by law.



Enacted by Chapter 184, 1991 General Session

